Utah statutes.
19-6-107.   Director -- Appointment -- Powers.

(1)  The executive director shall appoint the director.  The director shall serve under the administrative direction of the executive director.

(2)  The director shall:

(a)  carry out inspections pursuant to Section 19-6-109;

(b)  require submittal of specifications or other information relating to hazardous waste plans for review, and approve, disapprove, revoke, or review the plans;

(c)  develop programs for solid waste and hazardous waste management and control within the state;

(d)  advise, consult, and cooperate with other agencies of the state, the federal government, other states and interstate agencies, and with affected groups, political subdivisions, and industries in furtherance of the purposes of this part;

(e)  subject to the provisions of this part, enforce rules made or revised by the board through the issuance of orders;

(f)  review plans, specifications or other data relative to solid waste and hazardous waste control systems or any part of the systems as provided in this part;

(g)  under the direction of the executive director, represent the state in all matters pertaining to interstate solid waste and hazardous waste management and control including, under the direction of the board, entering into interstate compacts and other similar agreements; and

(h)  as authorized by the board and subject to the provisions of this part, act as executive secretary of the board under the direction of the chairman of the board.

(3)  The director may:

(a)  subject to Subsection 19-6-104(1)(f), settle or compromise any administrative or civil action initiated to compel compliance with this part and any rules adopted under this part;

(b)  employ full-time employees necessary to carry out this part;

(c)  as authorized by the board pursuant to the provisions of this part, authorize any employee or representative of the department to conduct inspections as permitted in this part;

(d)  encourage, participate in, or conduct studies, investigations, research, and demonstrations relating to solid waste and hazardous waste management and control necessary for the discharge of duties assigned under this part;

(e)  collect and disseminate information relating to solid waste and hazardous waste management control; and

(f)  cooperate with any person in studies and research regarding solid waste and hazardous waste management and control.



Amended by Chapter 360, 2012 General Session

